Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 3

Receipt and Deposit

9-4-301. State funds to be deposited.

It is the duty of every department, institution, office and agency of the state and every officer and employee of state government, including the state treasurer, collecting or receiving state funds, to deposit them immediately into the state treasury or to the account of the state treasurer in a bank designated as a state depository or to the appropriate departmental account if authorized by § 9-4-302. The state funding board has the authority to establish a cash management policy to govern the cash management and deposit practices of every department, institution, office and agency of state government. The board is authorized to review cash management practices and make recommendations to appropriate state officials regarding modifications to current practices as well as the cash processing equipment needs of various state agencies.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, and notwithstanding any written comment on the payment instrument or any other verbal or written comment, whenever any official deposits state funds in accordance with subsection (a), in any form or description, including, but not limited to, checks, drafts or warrants, that deposit shall in no manner relieve the person or organization submitting the amount of any liability which has or is subsequently determined to be owed to the state except to the extent that the amount deposited discharges the amount owed to the state. When an instrument is tendered by such person or organization and is deposited by the state for an amount which is less than the full amount owed, the remaining liability is enforceable in the same manner as the original amount owed to the state.

Such deposit shall be made without any deductions on account of salaries, fees, costs, charges, expenses, refunds, claims, or demands of any description whatsoever.

Unless otherwise provided by law, all county and other officials collecting moneys for the use and benefit of the state shall remit the same to the commissioner of revenue in accordance with procedures established by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the state treasurer and the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 24; 1986, ch. 923, § 2; 1988, ch. 602, § 7.

9-4-302. Departmental accounts.

No department, officer or agency of state government, except the state treasurer, shall deposit state funds to the credit of such department, officer or agency in any financial institution except as provided in this section.

Whenever the satisfactory conduct of the state's business clearly demands it, and not otherwise, the commissioner of finance and administration, with the approval of the governor and the state treasurer, may authorize establishment of an account in the name of a state department or agency in a state depository.

Whenever state officials are required to hold funds in trust as a result of their official duties, such funds may be held in departmental accounts, unless otherwise directed by the commissioner of finance and administration, the governor and the state treasurer.

Whenever a departmental account is established, unless otherwise provided, funds in the account shall be invested in accordance with § 9-4-602.

A petty cash account may be allowed by the commissioner of finance and administration to each state department, institution or agency, which shall in the opinion of the commissioner require such account, and such account so established shall be reimbursed only upon statements and bills audited by the department of finance and administration. In the event that a petty cash account requires the establishment of a separate account in a financial institution, such account shall be established in accordance with subsection (b).

The commissioner of finance and administration shall promptly notify the comptroller of the treasury of any accounts established pursuant to this section.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 25; 1986, ch. 923, § 3.

9-4-303. Educational institutions.

Sections9-4-301 and9-4-302 shall not apply to institutions and other entities governed by the board of trustees of the University of Tennessee or the state board of regents. Those institutions and other entities shall operate in accordance with procedures established by their respective governing boards which are consistent with the provisions regulating other state agencies. The institutions and other entities governed by the board of trustees of the University of Tennessee or the state board of regents may participate in the state pooled investment fund established pursuant to §9-4-603.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 26; 1986, ch. 551, § 3.

9-4-304. Service charges on state accounts.

Whenever interest bearing accounts are established by the state treasurer or other state official pursuant to §9-4-301, §9-4-302 or §9-4-307, reasonable service charges may be deducted from interest income pursuant to procedures established by the state treasurer and commissioner of finance and administration. There is hereby appropriated from interest income an amount sufficient to pay such charges.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 27.

9-4-305. Deposit certification.

All deposits made pursuant to § 9-4-301, except as provided in subsection (b), shall be evidenced by a deposit certification in accordance with procedures established by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the state treasurer.

Deposits of state funds that result from transfers within the banking system utilizing electronic transfer of funds and initiated by the state treasurer shall be evidenced by those documents and advices as are used within the banking system to execute such funds transfer, and shall be accepted by the commissioner of finance and administration in lieu of deposit certifications. Such documents and advices shall be delivered directly by the state treasurer to the commissioner of finance and administration. The use of the term “banking system” in this subsection (b) shall not be construed to restrict the definition of “state depository” to any meaning other than that set forth in § 9-4-107.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 28; 1986, ch. 923, § 4.

9-4-306. Monthly reports.

Each state depository where public deposits are made by the state treasurer shall transmit to the state treasurer a monthly statement of moneys received, charges assessed, interest credited and amounts paid by it on account of the state.

Each state depository where a departmental account is maintained shall transmit to the department or agency head a monthly statement of moneys received, charges assessed, interest credited and amounts paid by it.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 29.

9-4-307. State depositories.

The state treasurer is authorized to open accounts in state depositories and establish procedures to be followed by each depository for the handling of state deposits.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 30.

9-4-308. Transfer of funds through federal reserve banking system.

The state treasurer, in the exercise of the state treasurer's official duties, is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with any federal reserve bank as the state treasurer deems necessary or advisable, for the purpose of transferring funds through the facilities of the federal reserve banking system. Such agreements may contain terms and conditions determined by the state treasurer to be advisable, including, but not limited to, provisions relative to indemnification, hold harmless, and choice of law.

Acts 1977, ch. 269, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-613; Acts 1980, ch. 446, § 2; T.C.A. §9-6-115; Acts 2020, ch. 755, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the section which read: “The state treasurer, in the exercise of such state treasurer's official duties, is hereby authorized to enter into a contract with a federal reserve member bank or trust company located in Tennessee, including the trust company created by chapter 4, part 8 of this title, for the purpose of transferring public funds and funds of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system through the facilities of the federal reserve banking system.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 755, § 2. June 22, 2020.